Maryland, session 2026, HB0018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
10–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0018*

HOUSE BILL 18
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(l) “Transportation network company” means a company that operates in the
State using a digital network to connect passengers to transportation network operators or
transportation network partners for transportation network services.
(m) “Transportation network operator”, “transportation network partner”, or
“transportation network driver” means an individual who:
(1) has been issued a transportation network operator’s license, or is
otherwise authorized, by the Commission to provide transportation network services;
(2) receives, through a transportation network company’s digital network
application, a connection to a potential passenger to transport the passenger between
points chosen by the passenger in exchange for the payment of a fee to the transportation
network company; and
(3) uses a motor vehicle that is owned, leased, or otherwise authorized for
use by the individual and is approved for use in providing transportation network services
by the Commission.
(n) (1) “Transportation network services” means the activities of an operator
during:
(i) transportation network coverage period one, during which the
operator is logged onto and ready to accept a prearranged ride request made through a
transportation network company’s digital network application;
(ii) transportation network coverage period two, during which the
operator accepts a ride request from a passenger that is prearranged through a
transportation network company’s digital network application, and is traveling to a
predetermined location to pick up the passenger; and
(iii) transportation network coverage period three, during which the
operator transports the passenger and continuing until the passenger departs the motor
vehicle.
(2) “Transportation network services” does not include:
(i) providing taxicab services, sedan services, or limousine services;
(ii) any shared expense carpool arrangement or service or other type
of arrangement or service in which a driver receives a fee that does not exceed the driver’s
costs associated with providing a ride; or

HOUSE BILL 18 3
(iii) transportation services that a nonprofit organization provides
through the use of a volunteer driver and the volunteer driver’s personal vehicle.
10–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Insurance Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner of the
Maryland Insurance Administration.
(c) “Operator” means a transportation network operator, transportation network
partner, or transportation network driver.
10–410.
(A) FOR A PASSENGER TRIP ORIGINATING IN THE STATE AFTER JULY 1,
2026, A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY SHALL PAY EACH OPERATOR:
(1) A MINIMUM OF:
(I) $1.66 PER MILE; AND
(II) $0.40 PER MINUTE;
(2) AN ADDITIONAL $1.18 PER MILE IF AN OPERATOR IS USING A
WHEELCHAIR ACCESSIBLE VEHICLE;
(3) AT LEAST $5.00 FOR EACH PASSENGER TRIP, REGARDLESS OF
TRIP DURATION OR MILEAGE; AND
(4) AT LEAST 80% OF ANY CANCELLATION FEE CHARGED BY THE
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY IF A PASSENGER TRIP IS CANCELED AFTER
BOOKING.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON JULY 1,
2027, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, THE MINIMUM AMOUNT A TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY SHALL PAY EACH OPERATOR PER MILE AND PER MINUTE AS
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCREASE BY AN
AMOUNT THAT EQUALS THE PRODUCT OF MULTIPLYING:
(I) THE MINIMUM AMOUNT PER MILE AND PER MINUTE
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR;
AND

HOUSE BILL 18
(II) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS OR A SUCCESSOR INDEX PUBLISHED BY THE
U.S. BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS.
(2) (I) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE DETERMINED BY COMPARING THE AVERAGE OF THE INDEX
FOR THE 12 MONTHS ENDING ON THE JUNE 30 IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE YEAR
FOR WHICH THE MINIMUM AMOUNT PER MILE AND PER MINUTE IS BEING
CALCULATED TO THE AVERAGE OF THE INDEX FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
12 MONTHS.
(II) IF THERE IS A DECLINE OR NO GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER
PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS OR IN THE SUCCESSOR INDEX, THE
MINIMUM AMOUNT PER MILE AND PER MINUTE SHALL REMAIN UNCHANGED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.